src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON TJOEVERIDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%>               VSUF-ODD-PRS ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%>               VSUF-ODD-PRT ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>     VSUF-ODD-IMP ;

! Infinite forms
! --------------
     +V+IV+Inf:%>idh            FINAL1       ;
  +V+IV+ConNeg:%>%^DISIMPh      FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+VGen:%>%^DISIMPen     FINAL1 ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
! +V+IV+Act:%>immie           FINAL1 ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
     +V+IV+Ger:%>%^DISIMPeminie FINAL1       ; ! = GH Gerundium
! +V+IV+PrsPrc+Der+Der/A+A+Attr:%>æjja     FINAL1 ; !XXX Testing, thinking aloud
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ihks+A+Attr:%>ihks     FINAL1 ; !XXX Testing, thinking aloud
  +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>amme           FINAL1       ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
  
!   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here

!!+V+IV+VAbess:%>h            FINAL1 ;
! On the issue on a possible Verbal abessive (karitiv), cf Hasselbrink:
! GH s. 139, V-Adj: präd -k(e)h , attr -k(e)s
! äbrekh ohne zu regnen, äbreks der nicht regnet, baal'eks der nicht gräbt, b'üdnekh ungezwirnt
! vädd'ekh ungegeben, ohne zu geben

! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»æjj@C.NeedNoun@     MAANA ;
! +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>æjja         FINAL1 ; ! = GH Ptz.Pr. => must go to nominal lexicon instead
! +V+IV+Der2+Der/adte+V:%»%^adteUMLadt GOEGKERDADTEDH ;

LEXICON GOLTELIDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+TV: GOLTELIDH ;

LEXICON AALHTEDIDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                +V+TV:                GOLTELIDH ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:%^ConsDel%»sovv SOVVEDH   ;

LEXICON AALHTEDIDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                +V+IV:                GOLTELIDH ;

LEXICON GOLTELIDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+IV: GOLTELIDH ;


LEXICON GOLTELIDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@**, odd-syll with -adte- as Der2
                                    COMMON-ODD     ;
   +Der2+Der/ht:%»eht             ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ;
  +Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»æjj             flagMAANA          ;
          +PrsPrc:%>æjja            flagFINAL1         ; ! = GH Ptz.Pr. => must go to nominal lexicon instead
 +Der2+Der/adte+V:%»%^adteUMLadt    GOEGKERDADTEDH ;
 +Der3+Der/PassL:%»ovv  IV_PASSIVE_L ;
 
 
  

LEXICON BALVEDIDH  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                  +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>%^DISIMPe       FINAL1     ;
                  +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i               FINAL1     ;
          +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1     ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>     VSUF-ODD-IMP ;

! Infinite forms
! --------------
                          +V+IV+Inf:%>idh             FINAL1     ;
                       +V+IV+ConNeg:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1     ;
                         +V+IV+VGen:%>%^DISIMPen      FINAL1     ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
! +V+IV+Act:%>immie           FINAL1 ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
                          +V+IV+Ger:%>%^DISIMPeminie  FINAL1     ; ! = GH Gerundium
! +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>æjja         FINAL1 ; ! = GH Ptz.Pr. => must go to nominal lexicon instead
! +V+IV+A+Der1+Der/æjja+Attr:%>æjja     FINAL1 ; !XXX Testing, thinking aloud
! +V+IV+A+Der1+Der/ihks+Attr:%>ihks     FINAL1 ; !XXX Testing, thinking aloud
                       +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>amme            FINAL1     ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
!   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here

!+V+IV+VAbess:%>h            FINAL1 ;
! On the issue on a possible Verbal abessive (karitiv), cf Hasselbrink:
! GH s. 139, V-Adj: präd -k(e)h , attr -k(e)s
! äbrekh ohne zu regnen, äbreks der nicht regnet, baal'eks der nicht gräbt, b'üdnekh ungezwirnt
! vädd'ekh ungegeben, ohne zu geben


! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»æjj@C.NeedNoun@     MAANA ;
              +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»imm flagNomActEven ;
         +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Inf:%»ahtj%>edh       FINAL1     ;
        +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+VGen:%»ahtj%>en        FINAL1     ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Act:%»ahtj%>eme      FINAL1 ;
         +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ger:%»ahtj%>eminie    FINAL1     ;
      +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc:%»ahtj%>eme       FINAL1     ;
      +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+ConNeg:%»ahtj%>0h        FINAL1     ;
     +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Sg3+Uml:%»ahtj%>%^3sUMLa  FINAL1     ;
         +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Sg3:%»ahtj%>i         FINAL1     ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»ahtj%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1     ;

LEXICON RIHPESIDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@**,  -nidh and -sidh
                 +V+IV:               COMMON-ODD     ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/alla+V:%»%^adteUMLall GOEGKERDADTEDH ;

LEXICON AAJVESTIDH_TV     !!≈ * **@CODE@**, for stems ending -t-: dåajvoeht-, odd-syll with -alle- as Der2 and passive -sovvedh
                +V+TV:                DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:%»ovv SOVVEDH      ;  !orrest

LEXICON DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+TV: DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
 
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:%»ovv SOVVEDH      ; ! Det finst ingen verb i denne klassen som triggar ConsDel
                                                     

LEXICON DÅAJVOEHTIDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+IV: DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:%»ovv SOVVEDH      ; ! Det finst ingen verb i denne klassen som triggar ConsDel
  
 
LEXICON DÅAJVOEHTIDH    !!≈ * **@CODE@** for stems ending -t-: dåajvoeht-, odd-syll with -alle- as Der2
                                     COMMON-ODD     ;
 +Der2+Der/ht:%»eht                ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ;
 +Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»æjj               flagMAANA          ;
          +PrsPrc:%>æjja             flagFINAL1         ; ! = GH Ptz.Pr. => must go to nominal lexicon instead
 +Der2+Der/alla+V:%»%^adteUMLall     GOEGKERDADTEDH ;

 
 
!! ### Inflection common to all odd verbs

LEXICON COMMON-ODD   !!≈ * **@CODE@**

!! * Finite forms
! ------------
              +Ind+Prs:%>                VSUF-ODD-PRS ;
              +Ind+Prt:%>                VSUF-ODD-PRT ;
                +Imprt:%>                VSUF-ODD-IMP ;

!! * Infinite forms
! --------------
                  +Inf:%>idh             FINAL1       ;
               +ConNeg:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1       ;
                 +VGen:%>%^DISIMPen      FINAL1       ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
! +Act:%>immie           FINAL1 ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
                  +Ger:%>%^DISIMPeminie  FINAL1       ; ! = GH Gerundium
               +PrsPrc:%>æjja            flagFINAL1       ; !XXX Testing, thinking aloud
 +Der1+Der/ihks+A+Attr:%>ihks            FINAL1       ; !XXX Testing, thinking aloud
               +PrfPrc:%>amme            FINAL1       ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
!   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here

!+VAbess:%>h            FINAL1 ;
! On the issue on a possible Verbal abessive (karitiv), cf Hasselbrink:
! GH s. 139, V-Adj: präd -k(e)h , attr -k(e)s
! äbrekh ohne zu regnen, äbreks der nicht regnet, baal'eks der nicht gräbt, b'üdnekh ungezwirnt
! vädd'ekh ungegeben, ohne zu geben


!! * Derivations
! -----------
      +Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»imm  flagNomActEven   ;
     +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ahtj            AHTJE        ;



!! ## Even-syllable verbs
! ===================

LEXICON MAEHTEDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+TV: BÅETEDH_NOTVGEN ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv SOVVEDH ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML VÅÅJNEDH ;
! +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»%^1UMLahtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+TV+Der1+Der/lg:%»%^1UMLalg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs


LEXICON BÅETEDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                     +V+TV:               BÅETEDH  ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Dial/SH:%>%^iUML       VSUF-PRT ;
  +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv  SOVVEDH  ;
!  +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML    VÅÅJNEDH ;
     +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»%^1UMLahtall SOVVEDH  ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
         +V+TV+Der1+Der/lg:%»%^1UMLalg    LGIDH    ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
